Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.090

Disclosure of content of electronic communications of principal.

To the extent a power of attorney expressly grants an agent authority over the content of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and unless directed otherwise by the principal or the court, a custodian shall disclose to the agent the content if the agent gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(2) An original or copy of the power of attorney expressly granting the agent authority over the content of electronic communications of the principal;

(3) A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(a) A number, user name, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal's account; or

(b) Evidence linking the account to the principal.

[ 2016 c 140 s 9.]